Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.850

Action by victim of false reporting—Liability to a public agency.

(1)(a) An individual who is a victim of an offense under RCW 9A.84.040 may bring a civil action against the person who committed the offense or against any person who knowingly benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from participation in a venture that the person knew or should have known has engaged in an act in violation of RCW 9A.84.040, and may recover damages and any other appropriate relief, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

(b) A person who is found liable under RCW 9A.84.040 shall be jointly and severally liable with each other person, if any, who is found liable under RCW 9A.84.040 for damages arising from the same violation of RCW 9A.84.040.

(2) Any person convicted of violating RCW 9A.84.040 and that resulted in an emergency response may be liable to a public agency for the reasonable costs of the emergency response by, and at the discretion of, the public agency that incurred the costs.

[ 2020 c 344 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2020 c 344: See note following RCW 9A.84.040.